Washington statutes.
RCW 14.16.050

Traffic rules.

The public safety requiring and the advantages of uniform regulation making it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress that any person operating aircraft within this state should conform to the air traffic rules now or hereafter established by the secretary of commerce of the United States for the navigation of aircraft subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, it shall be unlawful for any person to navigate any aircraft within this state otherwise than in conformity with said air traffic rules.

[ 1929 c 157 s 5; RRS s 2722-5.]

NOTES:

Federal aviation program: Title 49, chapter 20, U.S.C.